Alaska, session 34, HB294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 21.36 is amended by adding a new section to article 5 to read: 04 Sec. 21.36.530. Health care insurance deductibles. An insurer that offers, 05 issues for delivery, delivers, or renews a health care insurance policy may not require 06 an annual deductible that exceeds 07 (1) $1,700 for an individual plan; or 08 (2) $3,400 for a family plan. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.